Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.010

Acquisition of solid waste or recyclable materials sites authorized.

Any county legislative authority may acquire by purchase or by gift, dedication, or donation, sites for the use of the public in disposing of solid waste or recyclable materials. However, no county legislative authority shall be authorized to require any retail enterprise engaged in the sale of consumer-packaged products to locate or place a public solid waste collection site or buy-back center upon or within a certain distance of the retail establishment as a condition of engaging in the sale of consumer-packaged products.

[ 1989 c 431 s 52; 1963 c 4 s 36.58.010. Prior: 1943 c 87 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6294-150.]